.deps/sux.LR.lexd
ge6_par4<n><abs>:ge6-par4
mun_am3<n>:mun-am3
abul<n>:abul
du6_ur3<n><gen><dat-h>:du6-ur3
gur_ta<n><abl>:gur-ta
az<n><gen>:az
tug2_ge2<n>:tug2-ge2
mar_tu_ta<n>:mar-tu-ta
za3_mu_ka<n><gen>:za3-mu-ka
_gesz_haszhur<n>:\{gesz\}haszhur
na_da<n>:na-da
bara2_bara2_bi<n><abs>:bara2-bara2-bi
nam_erim2<n>:nam-erim2
GAN2<n>:GAN2
an_sze3<n><term>:an-sze3
munus_bi<n>:munus-bi
nagga_bi<n><abs>:nagga-bi
nig2_ka_a<n>:nig2-ka-a
_gesz_szu_szudulx_URxMIN_<n>:\{gesz\}\{szu\}szudulx\(\|URxMIN\|\)
da_na<n>:da-na
ki_la2<n>:ki-la2
kalam_ma<n><gen>:kalam-ma
duh_bi<n><abs>:duh-bi
dida<n>:dida
sar_ta<n><abl>:sar-ta
gi_IL2<n>:gi-IL2
ur_gi7<n><gen>:ur-gi7
ensi2_ka_ne<n><gen><pl>:ensi2-ka-ne
_<n>:'.
_a<n><abs>:_a
ku5<n>:ku5
nu_banda3_gu4_ka<n>:nu-banda3-gu4-ka
he_pi<n>:he-pi
nam_ra_asz<n><adv>:nam-ra-asz
sa12_du5<n>:sa12-du5
dumu_munus<n>:dumu-munus
siki_kur_ra<n>:siki-kur-ra
sag_nig2_gur11_ra_kam<n><abs><cop-3-sg>:sag-nig2-gur11-ra-kam
a2_ke4_ne<n>:a2-ke4-ne
en<n>:en
nig2_gur11<n>:nig2-gur11
c1_<n>:c1.
ugula_<n>:ugula!
u3_gar<n>:u3-gar
ki_sze3<n><gen><term>:ki-sze3
amar_du3_ta<n>:amar-du3-ta
u4_da_be2_esz<n>:u4-da-be2-esz
ar_za_na_sze3<n><gen><term><3-sg-h-poss>:ar-za-na-sze3
iti_<n>:iti!
sze_er_gu<n>:sze-er-gu
ga2_nun<n>:ga2-nun
ki_bala_a<n><gen><3-sg-nh-poss>:ki-bala-a
gurusz<n>:gurusz
gu2_gar_ra<n>:gu2-gar-ra
ansze_bi<n><abs><3-sg-nh-poss>:ansze-bi
dub_sar_e<n>:dub-sar-e
ki_ag2_ra<n>:ki-ag2-ra
ugnim<n>:ugnim
gu4<n>:gu4
a2_da_bar<n>:a2-da-bar
u2_a<n>:u2-a
muhaldim<n>:muhaldim
nam_munus_ka_ni<n><gen><3-sg-h-poss><abs>:nam-munus-ka-ni
i3_szah2<n>:i3-szah2
kikken2<n><gen><abs>:kikken2
gazi<n>:gazi
engar<n>:engar
u3_na_du11<n>:u3-na-du11
munu4<n>:munu4
ensi2_ka<n><gen>:ensi2-ka
2_bur3_<n>:2\(bur3\)
usz_bar_bi<n><abs><3-sg-nh-poss>:usz-bar-bi
sze_ba<n>:sze-ba
a_dara4<n>:a-dara4
in_nin<n>:in-nin
ge6_par4_ku3_ga_ni<n>:ge6-par4-ku3-ga-ni
sig4_gesz_i3_szub_ba_gar<n>:sig4-\{gesz\}i3-szub-ba-gar
ga_hul<n>:ga-hul
puzur4<n>:puzur4
szah2<n>:szah2
na_gi4_zu<n>:na-gi4-zu
x_ni<n><x><3-sg-h-poss>:x-ni
nidba<n><gen><3-sg-h-poss><abs>:nidba
e2_gal_sze3<n>:e2-gal-sze3
_u2_kiszi17<n>:\{u2\}kiszi17
igi_bi_sze3<n>:igi-bi-sze3
ba_ba<n>:ba-ba
szu_nir<n><2-sg-poss><abs>:szu-nir
iti_bi<n><abs><3-sg-nh-poss>:iti-bi
kar_e_BUR_<n>:kar-e!\(BUR\)
sag_gu4<n>:sag-gu4
mu10_us2<n><abs>:mu10-us2
udu_sze3<n>:udu-sze3
sza3_ga_na<n><3-sg-h-poss><l1>:sza3-ga-na
u8_sze3<n>:u8-sze3
egir6<n><gen>:egir6
iri_na_ka_iri_na_ka<n><gen><3-sg-h-poss><gen|n>:iri-na-ka\|iri-na-ka
masz<n>:masz
duh_hu_um<n>:duh-hu-um
li_ip_tum<n>:li-ip-tum
nin_a_ni_gin7<n><3-sg-h-poss><dat-h>:nin-a-ni-gin7
nig2_gi_na_ni_sze3<n><3-sg-h-poss><term>:nig2-gi-na-ni-sze3
is_su_uh<n>:is-su-uh
gur_bi<n><gen><abs><3-sg-nh-poss>:gur-bi
zi3_da<n><gen>:zi3-da
ur2_a_na_sze3<n>:ur2-a-na-sze3
ka_us2_sa2<n>:ka-us2-sa2
nig2_dab5<n>:nig2-dab5
di_ku5_bi_me<n><cop-3-pl><abs><3-sg-nh-poss>:di-ku5-bi-me
nam_en_na<n>:nam-en-na
ansze<n>:ansze
alan_na<n><3-sg-h-poss><abs>:alan-na
guru7_ta<n><abl><gen><1-sg-poss>:guru7-ta
diri<n>:diri
sag_dub<n>:sag-dub
ab2<n>:ab2
sze<n>:sze
li_il_qu3_ta<n>:li-il-qu3-ta
e2_gal_la<n><l1>:e2-gal-la
ulu3_di<n>:ulu3-di
b2_<n>:b2.
n_asz_<n>:n\(asz\)
dam_gar3<n>:dam-gar3
pu2<n>:pu2
munus_sa<n>:munus-sa
lugal_sza3_la2<n>:lugal-sza3-la2
al_tar_ra<n>:al-tar-ra
_u2_gamun2<n>:\{u2\}gamun2
ki_duru5<n>:ki-duru5
_gesz_kiri6<n>:\{gesz\}kiri6
na_ru2_a<n>:na-ru2-a
sza3_sahar<n><gen>:sza3-sahar
buru14<n>:buru14
kuruszda<n><gen><abs>:kuruszda
a2_asz2_a_ni<n>:a2-asz2-a-ni
1_barig_<n>:1\(barig\)
siki_ta<n>:siki-ta
munus<n>:munus
tesz2_bi<n><abs>:tesz2-bi
pisan_bi_sze3<n>:pisan-bi-sze3
numun_a_ni<n><3-sg-h-poss><abs>:numun-a-ni
sze_<n>:sze!
ku3_babbar_bi<n><abs><3-sg-nh-poss>:ku3-babbar-bi
nig2_dab5_bi<n><gen><abs><pl>:nig2-dab5-bi
nig2_dab5_ba<n>:nig2-dab5-ba
nam_geme2<n>:nam-geme2
me_TAR<n>:me-TAR
szu_du8_a_me_esz<n><gen><3-sg-h-poss>:szu-du8-a-me-esz
nig2_gesz_tag_ga<n>:nig2-\{gesz\}tag-ga
gu4_lah5<n>:gu4-lah5
erin2<n>:erin2
ul_li2_a_sze3<n>:ul-li2-a-sze3
masz2_bi<n><abs>:masz2-bi
bad3_gal_bi<n><abs><dem2>:bad3-gal-bi
eme_gi<n>:eme-gi
nigin_ba<n><gen><dem2>:nigin-ba
lugal_la<n>:lugal-la
diri_<n>:diri!
bur_sag<n>:bur-sag
kusz<n>:kusz
du6_du6_ra2<n><gen>:du6-du6-ra2
du10_us2<n>:du10-us2
za_pa_ag2_bi<n><l1><3-sg-nh-poss>:za-pa-ag2-bi
in_nu<n><gen>:in-nu
GAN2_ta<n><abl>:GAN2-ta
_gesz_ilar<n>:\{gesz\}ilar
kin<n>:kin
har<n>:har
szum2<n>:szum2
_kusz_sag_kesz2<n>:\{kusz\}sag-kesz2
mu_bi2_im<n><abs><3-sg-nh-poss>:mu-bi2-im
a_ga_na<n>:a-ga-na
szum2_<n>:szum2!
bala_bi<n>:bala-bi
ma2_lah5<n>:ma2-lah5
ma2_da_ga<n>:ma2-da-ga
ki_ta<n>:ki-ta
gesz<n>:gesz
_dub_sar<n>:_dub-sar
nun<n>:nun
iri_ki_ba<n><l3-nh><3-sg-h-poss>:iri\{ki\}-ba
gi_zi<n><gen>:gi-zi
tug2<n>:tug2
erin2_na_ka<n><gen>:erin2-na-ka
gi_guru7_a<n><l1>:gi-guru7-a
u4_de3<n><l3-nh>:u4-de3
sukkal<n>:sukkal
dub_me<n><cop-3-pl><abs>:dub-me
giri17<n>:giri17
GAN2_sze3<n>:GAN2-sze3
nam_<n><abs>:nam!
i3_<n>:i3!
dam_gar3_ta<n><abl><gen>:dam-gar3-ta
nirx_GAZxNIR_<n>:nirx\(\|GAZxNIR\|\)
sagi<n>:sagi
_d_szara2_ka<n>:\{d\}szara2-ka
urua<n><l1>:urua
igi<n>:igi
ARAD2<n>:ARAD2
buru14_bi<n><abs>:buru14-bi
si_i3_tum<n>:si-i3-tum
an_ki_a<n>:an-ki-a
nam_nun_na<n><gen><abs>:nam-nun-na
_ansze_zi_zi_munus<n>:\{ansze\}zi-zi-munus
_gi_ma_sa2_ab<n>:\{gi\}ma-sa2-ab
min3<n>:min3
gig<n>:gig
_uruda_ba_ri2_ga<n><gen>:\{uruda\}ba-ri2-ga
sze_gin2<n>:sze-gin2
im<n>:im
1_2_disz_<n>:1/2\(disz\)
a2_ra<n>:a2-ra
gesz_du3<n><abs>:gesz-du3
ki_ib<n>:ki-ib
a_lum<n>:a-lum
an_sza_an_na<n>:an-sza-an-na
sze_gesz_i3<n>:sze-gesz-i3
szi_im<n>:szi-im
gu4_apin_ta<n><abl><gen>:gu4-apin-ta
lugal_ga2_ta<n><abl><gen><1-sg-poss>:lugal-ga2-ta
ziz2<n>:ziz2
gesz_i3_ke4_ne<n><gen><pl>:gesz-i3-ke4-ne
ub_da<n>:ub-da
bala_a_ke4_ne<n><gen><pl>:bala-a-ke4-ne
ka_kesz2<n>:ka-kesz2
kas4_e_ne<n><pl>:kas4-e-ne
e2_bi<n><abs><3-sg-nh-poss>:e2-bi
gu4_gesz_apin<n><gen>:gu4-\{gesz\}apin
kuruszda_e<n><3-sg-h-poss><dat-h>:kuruszda-e
ki_a_nag<n>:ki-a-nag
szah2_ze2_da<n>:szah2-ze2-da
zi_de3_esz<n>:zi-de3-esz
_gesz_sza3_kal<n><gen><dat-h>:\{gesz\}sza3-kal
_ARAD2_zu<n><2-sg-poss><abs>:_ARAD2_-zu
gurusz_bi<n><abs><3-sg-nh-poss>:gurusz-bi
_ansze_kunga2<n><gen><abs>:\{ansze\}kunga2
pirig<n>:pirig
mu<n>:mu
sza3_kal<n>:sza3-kal
sag_kur2<n>:sag-kur2
4_ban2_<n>:4\(ban2\)
_gesz_mes<n>:\{gesz\}mes
sza3_gu4_me<n><cop-3-pl><abs>:sza3-gu4-me
ma2_gur8_mah<n><abs>:ma2-gur8-mah
ga_ar3<n>:ga-ar3
e_bi<n><3-sg-nh-poss>:e-bi
_dingir_<n>:_dingir_
du6_ku3_ge<n><gen><erg>:du6-ku3-ge
nig2_ka9_ta<n><abl><gen>:nig2-ka9-ta
gesztu2_ga<n>:gesztu2-ga
ku3<n>:ku3
ad_kup4<n><gen>:ad-kup4
ug3<n>:ug3
nin<n>:nin
ku3_babbar<n>:ku3-babbar
kas4_me_esz2<n>:kas4-me-esz2
eme_gi_ra<n>:eme!-gi-ra
kalam_ma_na_ka_sze3<n><gen><term><3-sg-h-poss>:kalam-ma-na-ka-sze3
_gesz_kab2_kul<n><gen>:\{gesz\}kab2-kul
gurusz_a<n><gen>:gurusz-a
pisan_dub_ba<n>:pisan-dub-ba
gi<n>:gi
u2_ki_im<n>:u2-ki-im
zar3<n>:zar3
he2_zu<n>:he2-zu
tir_ra<n><gen>:tir-ra
_d_na_ru2_a<n><gen>:\{d\}na-ru2-a
aga3_us2<n>:aga3-us2
sila4<n>:sila4
szabra_ta<n><abl>:szabra-ta
du6_ku3_ga<n><gen>:du6-<ku3>-ga
sag_lul_bi<n><2-sg-poss><abs>:sag-lul-bi
sila_ta<n><abl><gen>:sila-ta
nam_ti_sze3<n><3-sg-h-poss><term>:nam-ti-sze3
agrig<n>:agrig
mu6_sub3<n>:mu6-sub3
_dub_sar_<n>:_dub-sar_
ma_da_ba<n><abs><3-sg-nh-poss>:ma-da-ba
u2_sa_sa3_ku8<n>:u2-sa-sa3-ku8
kikken<n><gen>:kikken
mu_sar_ra_na<n><3-sg-h-poss><l2-nh>:mu-sar-ra-na
nu_dab5<n>:nu-dab5
si_mu_ru_um_ki_<n>:si-mu-ru-um\{ki\}
a2_gal_bi<n><gen><abs><dem2>:a2-gal-bi
i7_de3<n><dat-nh><3-sg-nh-poss>:i7-de3
ninda<n>:ninda
nig2_hul_dim2_ma<n><abs>:nig2-hul-dim2-ma
gukkal_me<n><cop-3-pl><3-sg-h-poss><abs>:gukkal-me
dingir_a_ni<n><3-sg-h-poss><dat-h>:dingir-a-ni
usz_bar_me<n><cop-3-pl><abs><3-sg-nh-poss>:usz-bar-me
sza3_ga<n><gen>:sza3-ga
gurum2<n>:gurum2
szu_<n><l3-nh>:szu!
ki_sar_a<n><l2-nh>:ki-sar-a
a_ra2<n>:a-ra2
e2_gal<n>:e2-gal
_gesz_HU<n>:\{gesz\}HU
nig<n>:nig
_a_pi4_sal4<n>:a-pi4-sal4
1_esze3_<n>:1\(esze3\)
_kusz_NIG2_ezem<n>:\{kusz\}NIG2-ezem
naga<n>:naga
suhusz<n>:suhusz
_gesz_u3_suh5<n>:\{gesz\}u3-suh5
e2_amar<n>:e2-amar
gu<n>:gu
alan_ga2<n><gen>:alan-ga2
szu_ku6<n>:szu-ku6
GAN2_mah_sze3<n>:GAN2-mah-sze3
dam_szi_lum_bi<n><abs><3-sg-nh-poss>:dam-szi-lum-bi
apin_la2_da<n>:apin-la2-da
ma2_ta<n>:ma2-ta
ezem_me_ki_gal2_e<n>:ezem-me-ki-gal2-e
iri_ki_sze3<n><gen><term><3-sg-h-poss>:iri\{ki\}-sze3
nam_szita_mu_sze3<n>:nam-szita-mu-sze3
du11_ga_ni_zi_kam<n>:du11-ga-ni-zi-kam
ur_sag<n>:ur-sag
geszkim<n>:geszkim
gidlam4_ni<n><abs>:gidlam4-ni
sa_ta<n><abl>:sa-ta
sag_bi_sze3<n>:sag-bi-sze3
_d_gu_za<n>:\{d\}gu-za
_szagina_<n>:_szagina_
gu2_ne_sag_ga2<n><abl>:gu2-ne-sag-ga2
du6_ku3_sig17<n>:du6-ku3-sig17
e2_a_ni<n><3-sg-h-poss><abs>:e2-a-ni
kuruszda_ta<n><abl>:kuruszda-ta
ku3_babbar_am3<n>:ku3-babbar-am3
sza2<n>:sza2
nam_lu2_be6_lu5_da<n>:nam-lu2-be6-lu5-da
gu4_apin_la2_kam<n>:gu4-apin-la2-kam
sag_apin<n>:sag-apin
a2<n>:a2
ugnim_ke4_ne<n><gen><pl>:ugnim-ke4-ne
masz2_e<n><l3-nh>:masz2-e
bad3_x_mu<n><abs><1-sg-poss>:bad3-x-mu
me3<n><gen>:me3
i3_na_szum2<n>:i3-na-szum2
za3<n>:za3
la_ag<n>:la-ag
lugal_a_ni_ir<n><3-sg-h-poss><dat-h>:lugal-a-ni-ir
gaba_ri<n>:gaba-ri
sze29_sze3<n><3-sg-h-poss><term>:sze29-sze3
nig2_ar_ra<n>:nig2-ar-ra
siskur2<n>:siskur2
lukur<n>:lukur
1_ban2_<n>:1\(ban2\)
bar_si<n>:bar-si
dam_ni<n><3-sg-h-poss><abs>:dam-ni
sza3_gal<n>:sza3-gal
me3_a<n>:me3-a
sag_da_na_ka<n>:sag-da-na-ka
sza13_dub_ba_ka<n><gen>:sza13-dub-ba-ka
masz_da3_nita2<n>:masz-da3-nita2
sza3_gal_ni<n>:sza3-gal-ni
nu_gen_na<n>:nu-gen-na
x_x<n><2-sg-poss><abs>:x-x
_mu_<n>:mu
ARAD2_zu<n>:ARAD2-zu
nam_KAxX_zu<n>:nam-\|KAxX\|-zu
_dub_<n>:_dub_
ki_NA_tusz<n>:ki!\(NA\)-tusz
al<n>:al
n_disz_<n>:n\(disz\)
i3_dub<n>:i3-dub
ki_ba<n><l1><3-sg-nh-poss>:ki-ba
usan3<n><abs>:usan3
ugula_ne<n>:ugula-ne
kasz<n>:kasz
szu_su_ba<n><l1><3-sg-nh-poss>:szu-su-ba
in_nu_ha<n>:in-nu-ha
siki_ud5<n>:siki-ud5
sza3_bar<n>:sza3-bar
ar_za_na<n>:ar-<za>-na
pisan<n>:pisan
en_nun_gal<n><gen>:en-nun-gal
i_d_utu<n>:i-\{d\}utu
lugal_bi<n>:lugal-bi
siki<n>:siki
mu_sar<n><abs><3-sg-nh-poss>:mu-sar
e2_kur_ra<n><gen>:e2-kur-ra
aktum<n>:aktum
an_ub_da<n>:an-ub-da
sza_asz_ru_um<n>:sza-asz-ru-um
_sze<n>:_sze
musz<n>:musz
zi3_gu<n>:zi3-gu
gi_ra_num2_sze3<n>:gi-ra-num2-sze3
kas4_ke4_ne<n><gen><pl>:kas4-ke4-ne
in_nu_da<n><gen><erg>:in-nu-da
iti<n>:iti
gu_za<n>:gu-za
_uruda_ha_bu2_da<n>:\{uruda\}ha-bu2-da
gu2_nida<n><gen>:gu2-nida
dam_na_ni<n><3-sg-h-poss><abs>:dam-na-ni
sze_numun<n>:sze-numun
erim2<n>:erim2
dumu_gi7_ra<n><gen><abs>:dumu-gi7-ra
_u2_hirinx_KWU318_na<n>:\{u2\}hirinx\(KWU318\)-na
tur3<n>:tur3
murgu2<n>:murgu2
bur_ra<n>:bur-ra
gaba_ta<n><abl>:gaba-ta
sipa_ke4_ne<n><gen><pl>:sipa-ke4-ne
e2_tum<n>:e2-tum
sipa_ne<n><pl>:sipa-ne
nig2_sziti_ma<n>:nig2-sziti-ma
bala_ka<n><gen>:bala-ka
_bala_a_<n><gen><l1>:bala-a
azlag2<n><dat-h>:azlag2
kasz_de2_a<n>:kasz-de2-a
gurum2_ak<n><gen>:gurum2-ak
za3_bi<n><abs><3-sg-nh-poss>:za3-bi
_sila3_<n>:sila3
TUR<n>:TUR
szu_ni<n><abs>:szu-ni
_uruda_gur10<n><abs>:\{uruda\}gur10
erin2_na_bi<n><gen><abs>:erin2-na-bi
a_sza3_sze3<n><term>:a-sza3-sze3
ti<n>:ti
bar_e<n><erg>:bar-e
szesz_a_na<n>:szesz-a-na
mur_gu4<n>:mur-gu4
LAGAB<n><gen>:LAGAB
masz2_nita2<n><abs>:masz2-nita2
bala<n><l1>:bala
ki_gal_ba<n>:ki-gal-ba
sza3_ga_du3<n>:sza3-ga-du3
an<n>:an
duh<n>:duh
ar3<n>:ar3
szul<n>:szul
udu_a<n>:udu-a
mu_bi_im<n><abs><3-sg-nh-poss><cop-3-sg>:mu-bi-im
bur_e<n>:bur-e
aga3_kar2<n>:aga3-kar2
x<n>:x
tug2_ge<n><l3-nh>:tug2-ge
usz_bar_e<n><erg>:usz-bar-e
am_gin7_<n>:am-gin7!
_uruda_alam<n><abs>:\{uruda\}alam
_munus_asz2_gar3_sze3<n><term>:\{munus\}asz2-gar3-sze3
mud5_me_gar<n>:mud5-me-gar
bad3<n>:bad3
sar<n>:sar
a_sza3_ge<n><l3-nh>:a-sza3-ge
ka_us2_sa<n><2-sg-poss><abs>:ka-us2-sa
temen_be2<n><dat-nh><3-sg-nh-poss>:temen-be2
ezem<n>:ezem
dal_ta<n>:dal-ta
ur_sila_luh<n>:ur-sila-luh
n_disz_kam<n>:n\(disz\)-kam
kun_zi_da<n>:kun-zi-da
_gesz_giri3_gub<n>:\{gesz\}giri3-gub
gin_a<n>:gin-a
ensi2_ka_ta<n><abl><gen>:ensi2-ka-ta
numun<n>:numun
sig4<n>:sig4
lal3<n>:lal3
a_pi4_sal4<n>:a-pi4-sal4
_kusz_ummu3<n>:\{kusz\}ummu3
kas4<n><dat-h>:kas4
e2_ta<n><abl>:e2-ta
a_sza3_ga<n><gen>:a-sza3-ga
nam_sza3_tam<n>:nam-sza3-tam
szimaszki_KI_<n>:szimaszki\{KI\}
ka_guru7_ka<n>:ka-guru7-ka
lugal_ra_us2_sa<n>:lugal-ra-us2-sa
